Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-3029
Reports; failure to submit as prescribed; fee.

If a digital asset depository fails to submit any report required by the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act or by order or rules and regulations of the director within the prescribed period, the director may impose and collect a fee of five thousand dollars for each day the report is overdue, as established by order of the director. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Banking and Finance Settlement Cash Fund.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 29.